Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.120

Used equipment sales.

Proceeds from the sale of used equipment must be credited to the fund from which the original purchase price was paid.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.34.120. Prior: 1945 c 254 s 11; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 4014-11.]